Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 4, chapter 65, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Children’s advocacy center” means  a facility that meets the facility standards described in
ORS 418.788, to which a  child from the community may be referred to receive a thorough child
abuse assessment, as defined in ORS 418.782, for the purpose of determining  whether the child has
been abused or  neglected, and that facilitates a coordinated, comprehensive and multidisciplinary
response to cases of child abuse.
(b) “Regional children’s advocacy  center” means a facility operated by a children’s advocacy
center that meets the facility standards described in ORS 418.788  and is selected by the Child Abuse
Multidisciplinary  Intervention  Program to provide training and complex case assistance, including
one or more of the following:
(A) Consultation;
(B) Education;
(C) Referral;
(D) Technical assistance; and
(E) If authorized by the Department of Justice, other services as needed.
(2) The  Department of Justice shall develop and administer a one-time noncompetitive grant
program to expand access to services and supports provided by children’s advocacy centers and  re-
gional children’s advocacy centers and to increase the number of children served by children’s ad-
vocacy centers and regional children’s advocacy centers in this state.
(3)(a) The department shall distribute  50 percent of the amounts available for the grant program,
in equal shares to each children’s advocacy center that is providing services in this state on [ the
effective date of this 2024 Act ] March 27, 2024 .
(b) If the department is unable  to distribute one or more children’s advocacy center share or
portion of a share under this subsection  and amounts remain undistributed on June 30, 2025, the
department shall distribute the undistributed amounts to Oregon Child  Abuse Solutions for the
purpose of providing or coordinating the  provision of assistance to children’s advocacy centers
seeking accreditation with the National Children’s Alliance.
(4) The department shall distribute the remaining 50 percent of amounts available  for the grant
program as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 3195 (HB 3195-A) Page 1
(5) The department shall adopt rules for  distributing the remaining 50 percent of amounts
available for the grant program. The rules must, at a minimum:
(a) Require that an applicant  certify that on or before June 30, 2025, the applicant will be ac-
credited  by  the National Children’s Alliance or will have an application for accreditation with the
National Children’s Alliance pending.
(b) Require children’s advocacy centers to apply directly for the grants.
(c) Allow a health care  provider or a medical facility to apply for a grant to expand medical
assessment services, intervention services and any other services and  supports not inconsistent with
the purposes of ORS 418.746 to 418.796, if:
(A) The health care provider or medical facility is connected through a linkage agreement  or
contract with a children’s advocacy center; and
(B) The children’s advocacy center satisfies the accreditation  requirements described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection.
(d) Permit the department, when determining  the amounts of grants awarded under this sub-
section, to consider:
(A) The applicant’s  capability to expand access to or maintain a children’s advocacy center in
an underserved community;
(B) The applicant’s capability to expand access of a children’s advocacy center to a  geographic
area of this state with no children’s advocacy centers;
(C) The  likelihood that the applicant, if awarded a grant, will expand access to children’s ad-
vocacy center services and supports to children from  historically marginalized and underserved
communities;
(D) If awarded a grant, the ability  of the existing or proposed children’s advocacy center to
provide behavioral and mental health services for victims of child abuse;
(E) The applicant’s capability to provide services to drug endangered children; and
(F) The applicant’s capability to provide services to children who have been trafficked.
(e) Allow grant recipients to use the grants:
(A) To expand access to designated medical professionals, as described in ORS 418.747 (9); and
(B) For costs associated with obtaining accreditation from  the National Children’s Alliance, in-
cluding application fees and support staff expenses.
(f) Require applicants to demonstrate how the grant award would  allow for initial consultation
with a designated medical  professional, as defined in ORS 419B.023, within 48 hours in accordance
with Karly’s Law  and would improve response times for intervention following incidents of child
abuse and the prevention of child fatalities.
[(g) Provide that the total amount distributed to a given children’s  advocacy center under this
section may not exceed $300,000, calculated based on the total of: ]
[(A) Amounts distributed to the children’s advocacy center under subsection (3) of this section;
and]
[(B) Amounts awarded to the  children’s advocacy center under this subsection, including the
amounts of any grants awarded as permitted under paragraph (c)  of this subsection to a health care
provider or medical facility that is connected with the children’s advocacy center. ]
(6) The department  shall award and distribute all of the amounts available for grants under this
section no later than [ June] September 30, 2025.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to section 4, chapter  65, Oregon Laws 2024, by section 1
of this 2025 Act apply to distributions made from the  Children’s Advocacy Center One-Time
Grant Fund before, on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3195 (HB 3195-A) Page 2
Passed by House February 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3195 (HB 3195-A) Page 3